test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-paakeet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - paakeet: # 2B
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Nom: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Gen: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Acc: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Ill: pakettân
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Loc: pakettist
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Com: pakettáin
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Abe: pakkeettáá
    pakkeet+N+Ess:    pakettin
    pakkeet+N+Par:    pakettid
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Nom: paketteh
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Gen: pakettij
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Acc: pakettijd
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Ill: pakettáid
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Loc: pakettijn
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Com: pakettijguin
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Abe: pakettijttáá
